District of Columbia statutes.
31-231

Unauthorized entities.

No person shall act as an insurer, or engage in any other activity, directly or indirectly, which is regulated in acts codified in Chapters 1 through 55 of this title unless performed within the scope of a certificate of authority issued by the Commissioner as provided by this chapter. The prohibitions in this chapter shall not apply to persons or entities engaging in activity pursuant to §§ 31-2502.39 and 31-2502.40.

Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-232, § 102, 54 DCR 368
This section is referenced in § 31-232.